src/fst/incoming/bop-ipa.xfst
define C [б|в|г|д|ж|з|к|л|м|н|п|р|с|т|ф|х|ц|ч|ш];
define V [а|е|и|о|у|ъ];
define IPA [~$[ɑ|b|v|g|d|ɛ|ʒ|z|i|k|l̪|m|n|ɔ|p|r|s|t|u|f|x|ʦ|ʧ|ʃ|ə|ʤ|ʣ|ʲ|j|ˈ]]
.o.
[[ј -> ʲ || C _,,
ј -> j || [V|.#.] _] .o. ~$ј]
.o.
[[[д ж] -> ʤ] .o. ~$[д ж]]
.o.
[[[д з] -> ʣ] .o. ~$[д з]]
.o.
[а -> ɑ,
б -> b,
в -> v,
г -> g,
д -> d,
е -> ɛ,
ж -> ʒ,
з -> z,
и -> i,
к -> k,
л -> l̪,
м -> m,
н -> n,
о -> ɔ,
п -> p,
р -> r,
с -> s,
т -> t,
у -> u,
ф -> f,
х -> x,
ц -> ʦ,
ч -> ʧ,
ш -> ʃ,
ъ -> ə,
´ -> ˈ];
